Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Chapter 26 Conversion

§ 17-26-101.
Conversion of entities.

Any entity, domestic or foreign, may convert to any other entity, domestic or foreign, pursuant to this section. As used in this section, “entity” means any entity authorized to be formed under this title and organized under the laws of this state or the laws of another state that are the functional equivalent.

A domestic entity may be converted into any form of foreign entity recognized in that foreign jurisdiction pursuant to this section.

A foreign entity may be converted into a domestic entity if the conversion is authorized pursuant to the articles of incorporation, articles of organization, certificate of limited partnership, articles of association, registration statement or other document of similar import filed or recorded by or for an entity in the jurisdiction in which the entity is formed.

The converting domestic or foreign entity shall approve the terms and conditions of the conversion in accord with the documents enumerated in subsection (c) of this section.

After the conversion is approved, the newly converted domestic entity shall file the appropriate document of organization as enumerated in subsection (c) of this section and include:

Information that clearly names and identifies the converting entity and the newly converted entity;

The state of original formation and the date of original organization; and

Proof that conversion is approved by the owners or members of the converting entity in accordance with the authority given the converting entity.

The conversion takes effect when the appropriate document of organization enumerated in subsection (c) of this section is filed or at any later date specified in the document.

Upon conversion, all property owned by the converting entity remains in the newly converted entity. All obligations of the converting entity continue as obligations of the newly converted entity. Any action or proceeding pending against the converting entity may be continued as if the conversion had not occurred.

The secretary of state shall charge a fee to convert an entity. Unless otherwise specified by law, the fee for conversion shall be equal to the fee for the origination of the newly converted entity type.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 119, § 1; 2021 ch. 21, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to conversion of corporation to limited liability company, see §§

17-16-1115

and

17-16-1116

.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added (h).

Effective dates. —

Laws 2003, ch. 119, § 2, makes the act effective on July 1, 2003.

Insured. —

In a title
insurance dispute, a limited liability partnership was an insured
because it automatically took ownership of the property when it
converted
to a Wyoming limited liability partnership, amended its
certificate
of limited partnership to change its name, and withdrew
its registration
as a Colorado limited liability limited partnership.
The ordinary
meaning of a transfer by operation of law was one
that
did not involve
an exchange of money or other equivalent consideration. N. Fork Land & Cattle, LLLP v. First Am. Title Ins. Co., 2015 WY 150, 362 P.3d 341,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Wyo. 2015).